Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1360
License; expiration.

Except as otherwise provided in the Cremation of Human Remains Act, licenses issued pursuant to the act shall expire five years after the date of issuance. Licenses shall be issued only for the crematory authority named in the application and shall not be transferable or assignable.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 6.